North Dakota, session 69, HB1048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 14-09.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
14-09.1-07. Mediation agreementsummary.
The mediator shall reduce to writingprepare a written summary of any agreement of the parties.
The mediator shall inform the parties of their right to review the agreement with counsel before they
sign the agreement. After the agreement issummary may not be shown to the court unless signed by
the parties, the mediator shall present the agreement to the court. The agreement is not binding upon
the parties until approved by order of the court. The mediator shall advise the court whether an
agreement was reached.

H. B. NO. 1048 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1048.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State